Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-815 Administration in more
than one state; duty of personal representative. (a) All assets of
estates being administered in this State are subject to all claims, allowances
and charges existing or established against the personal representative wherever
appointed.

(b) If the estate either in this State or as a
whole is insufficient to cover all family exemptions and allowances determined
by the law of the decedent's domicile, prior charges and claims, after
satisfaction of the exemptions, allowances and charges, each claimant whose
claim has been allowed either in this State or elsewhere in administrations of
which the personal representative is aware, is entitled to receive payment of
an equal proportion of that claimant's claim. If a preference or security in
regard to a claim is allowed in another jurisdiction but not in this State, the
creditor so benefitted is to receive dividends from local assets only upon the
balance of the creditor's claim after deducting the amount of the benefit.

(c) In case the family exemptions and
allowances, prior charges and claims of the entire estate exceed the total
value of the portions of the estate being administered separately and this
State is not the state of the decedent's last domicile, the claims allowed in
this State shall be paid their proportion if local assets are adequate for the
purpose, and the balance of local assets shall be transferred to the
domiciliary personal representative. If local assets are not sufficient to pay
all claims allowed in this State the amount to which they are entitled, local
assets shall be marshalled so that each claim allowed in this State is paid its
proportion as far as possible, after taking into account all dividends on
claims allowed in this State from assets in other jurisdictions. [L 1996, c
288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next